Hawaii statutes.
§621C-1 Self-incrimination claim precluded.
If a person refuses, on the basis of the person's privilege against self-
incrimination, to testify or produce a record, document, or other object in an
official proceeding conducted under the authority of:

(1) A court or grand jury;

(2) An agency of the State; or

(3) Either house of the legislature, a joint
committee of the two houses, or a committee or a subcommittee of either house;

and the presiding officer informs the person of an
order issued under this chapter, the person may not refuse to comply with the
order on the basis of the person's privilege against self- incrimination. [L
1978, c 212, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Cross References

Antitrust proceedings, see §§480-23 to 23.4.

Refusal to testify, obstruction of justice, see §710-1072.5.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next